South Dakota, session 2026, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-33A:
Each board of a school district and governing board of an accredited nonpublic
school shall provide for the implementation of a cardiac emergency response plan in every
school under its control.
Each plan must be developed in collaboration with local emergency service
providers, using nationally recognized core elements related to cardiac emergency
response. The plan must provide for:
(1) The creation of a cardiac emergency response team able to respond to incidents of
sudden cardiac arrest or similar life-threatening emergencies on school grounds;
(2) The placement of automated external defibrillators in clearly marked, unlocked,
accessible locations on school grounds;
(3) The provision of staff training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an
automated external defibrillator; and
(4) The procedures for responding to incidents of sudden cardiac arrest or similar life-
threatening emergencies on school grounds.
The board of each school district and the governing board of each accredited
nonpublic school shall review the cardiac emergency response plan for every school under
its control and shall provide for the annual testing and any required maintenance of each
automated external defibrillator.
The board of each school district and the governing board of each accredited
nonpublic school shall conduct, at each school under its control, an annual drill responding
to incidents of sudden cardiac arrest or similar life-threatening emergencies, as provided
in the school's cardiac emergency response plan.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.358.21 2 1073
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-33A:
Every public and accredited nonpublic school shall arrange for annual training in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first-aid, and the use of an automated external defibrillator
for each employee serving as a member of the school's cardiac emergency response team,
pursuant to section 1 of this Act.
Training must consist of at least three hours of instruction, be provided by an
emergency medical services provider, or an organization approved by the Department of
Health, and follow evidence-based guidelines on emergency cardiovascular care set forth
by a nationally recognized organization. Training may occur in-person or online, as set
forth in each school's cardiac emergency response plan.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-33A:
Except in the case of gross negligence, a school district, the board of a district, and
any employee, student, or volunteer of a district are immune from any civil or criminal
liability resulting from an act or omission related to a cardiac emergency response plan
developed in accordance with this Act.
Except in the case of gross negligence, an accredited nonpublic school, the
governing board of an accredited nonpublic school, and any employee, student, or
volunteer of a nonpublic school are immune from any civil or criminal liability resulting
from an act or omission related to a cardiac emergency response plan developed in
accordance with this Act.
Section 4. There is appropriated $150,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Health, for grants to school districts and accredited nonpublic schools for the purchase of
automated external defibrillators.
Section 5. The secretary of the Department of Health shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor hall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 6. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures described in chapter 4-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.